Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 3 Office of Housing

Cross references.

Urban residential finance authorities for municipalities of 400,000 or more in population, §

36-41-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 1-1, effective July 1, 1991, repealed the Code sections formerly codified as this article and enacted the current article.
The former unit consisted of §§

8-3-170

to 8-3-176, 8-3-176.1, 8-3-177 to 8-3-189 (Part 1), 8-3-190, 8-3-190.1, 8-3-191 to 8-3-193, 8-3-193.1, 8-3-194 to 8-3-198 (Part 2), and 8-3-199 and 8-3-199.1 (Part 3) and was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 975, §§ 1-17; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1651, §§ 1-29; Ga. L. 1976, p. 651, § 6; Ga. L. 1977, p. 259, §§ 1-8; Ga. L. 1977, p. 603, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1541, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1543, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1266, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1269, §§ 1-11; Ga. L. 1981, p. 718, §§ 1-9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1716, §§ 1-13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1813, §§ 1, 2, 32-35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2228, §§ 3, 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1228, §§ 1-10; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1374, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 818, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1121, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 344, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 899, §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 234, §§ 1-9; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1550, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 792, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 8(2); Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1039, §§ 1-11; Ga. L. 1990, p. 2024, § 1.
For present provisions governing the Housing and Finance Authority, see §

50-26-1

et seq.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 8, and Ga. L. 1991, p. 391, §§ 1, 2, amended former Code Section 8-3-170 prior to its repeal by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 1-1.

8-3-170.
Legislative findings; powers and duties of State Office of Housing.

The General Assembly finds and declares that housing is an issue of paramount concern to this state which affects the health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of this state and the economic viability and planned growth of its communities. The General Assembly further finds and declares that the provision of and planning for housing and housing related matters are issues that are intrinsically intertwined with the ability to provide for the financing of housing activities. For this reason, the General Assembly designates the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority as the State Office of Housing and assigns it the following powers and duties:

To be responsible for the planning, development, and implementation of a coordinated state housing program;

To provide technical and financial assistance on housing and housing related matters throughout the state;

To perform such housing related duties as may be assigned it by the Governor or the General Assembly;

To apply for and receive and to administer federal funds under any federal housing program for which the state is an eligible applicant and, in the administration of such funds, to enter into such contracts as it deems necessary and to expend such state funds as the General Assembly may appropriate for such purposes;

To coordinate activities and work in conjunction with the Farmers Home Administration, which activities may include, but not be limited to, processing loan applicants and loans, community outreach activities, and financial assistance in the form of interest or down payment subsidies or write-downs; and

To coordinate housing related activities and work in conjunction with private, federal, or quasi-governmental entities, which entities shall include, but not be limited to, the Federal Housing Administration, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, and the Government National Mortgage Association.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 1-1.

8-3-171.
State housing goal and report; assistance by other agencies and political subdivisions.

The General Assembly affirms the state’s policy to provide decent, safe, and affordable housing to all segments of the population of this state.
The State Office of Housing is authorized and directed to develop a state housing goal and shall prepare a state housing goal report for presentation to the General Assembly, commencing with the 1990 session and continuing every even-numbered year thereafter.
The report shall identify housing needs and housing accomplishments and outline plans for achieving the state housing goal. The state and its agencies, institutions, authorities, commissions, bureaus, and entities which are political subdivisions of the state, cities and counties, local housing authorities, and any urban residential finance authority are authorized and directed to provide such information and perform such duties and functions as may be required to assist the State Office of Housing to prepare its reports and perform its functions.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 1-1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Financing Affordable Housing in Georgia:
The Possibility of a Dedicated Revenue Source,” see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 363 (1997).

8-3-172.
Funding for single-family housing; construction requirements.

The State Office of Housing shall award state or federal funds to construct single-family affordable housing for individuals and families of low and very low income only to persons whose application indicates that the affordable housing that is the subject of the application and for which a building permit is issued on or after July 1, 2000, will be constructed so that:

At least one entrance door, whether located at the front, side, or back of the building:

Is on an accessible route served by a ramp or no-step entrance; and

Has at least a standard 36 inch door;

On the first floor of the building:

Each interior door is at least a standard 32 inch door, unless the door provides access only to a closet of less than 15 square feet in area;

Each hallway has a width of at least 36 inches and is level, with ramped or beveled changes at each door threshold;

Each bathroom wall is reinforced for potential installation of grab bars;

Each electrical panel or breaker box, light switch, or thermostat is not higher than 48 inches above the floor; and

Each electrical plug or other receptacle is at least 15 inches above the floor; and

The main breaker box is located inside the building on the first floor.

A person who builds single-family affordable housing to which this Code section applies may obtain a waiver from the State Office of Housing of the requirement described in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of this Code section if the cost of grading and other improvements to the terrain which are required in order to meet the requirement of such subparagraph is unreasonably expensive.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-172

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 490, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “single-family” was substituted for “single family” in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in subsection (b).